en: Cardamom powder
fr: Cardamome en poudre, Poudre de cardamome
hr: Kardamom u prahu
ja: カルダモンパウダー
lt: Kardamono milteliai

en: Cinnamon
bg: Канела
de: Zimt
es: Canela
fi: kaneli
fr: Cannelle
hr: Cimet
hu: Fahély
it: Cannella
ja: シナモン
la: Cinnamomum
lt: Cinamonas
nl: Kaneel
pl: Cynamon

en: Cinnamon powder
bg: Канела на прах
de: Zimtpulver
es: Canela molida, Canela en polvo
fi: kanelijauhe
fr: Cannelle en poudre, cannelle moulue
hr: Cimet u prahu
hu: Fahélypor
it: Polvere di cannella
ja: シナモンパウダー
lt: Cinamono milteliai
nl: Kaneelpoeder

en: Cinnamon sticks
de: Zimtstangen
es: Canela en rama
fr: Bâtons de cannelle
hr: Štapići cimeta
ja: シナモンスティック
lt: Cinamono lazdelės
nl: Kaneelstokken, Kaneelstengels

en: Cloves
de: Gewürznelken
es: Clavos, Clavos de olor, Clavo
fr: Clous de girofle
hr: Klinčići
hu: Szegfűszeg
ja: クローブ
la: Syzygium aromaticum
lt: Gvazdikėliai
nl: Kruidnagels

en: Ground cloves
es: Clavos en polvo, Clavo en polvo
fr: Clou de girofle en poudre
hr: Mljeveni klinčić
lt: Malti gvazdikėliai
nl: Kruidnagelpoeders

en: Whole cloves
es: Clavos enteros, Clavo entero
hr: Cijeli klinčić
nl: Hele kruidnagels

en: Curry powders, Curry powder
bg: Къри на прах
da: Karrypulvere
de: Curry Pulver, Curry
es: Curry en polvo
fr: Curry en poudre, Poudre de curry, Curry, kari
hr: Curry prah
ja: カレー粉
lt: Kario milteliai
nb: Karipulver, Karipulvere
nl: Kerriepoeders, Kerriepoeder, Curry, Kerrie
nn: Karipulver
sv: Currypulver

en: Monosodium glutamate, Glutamate
xx: MSG, E621
ar: غلوتامات أحادية الصوديوم
be: Глутамат натрыю, глутамат натру
bg: Мононатриев глутамат
bn: মনোসোডিয়াম গ্লুটামেট
ca: Glutamat monosòdic
da: Mononatriumglutamat, Det tredje krydderi, Tredje krydderi, Det 3. krydderi, 3. krydderi
de: Mononatriumglutamat
el: Άλας γλουταμινικού μονονατρίου
eo: Ununatria glutamatoj
es: Glutamato monosódico
et: Naatriumvesinikglutamaat
eu: Monosodio glutamato
fa: مونوسدیم گلوتامات
fi: Natriumglutamaatti
fr: Glutamate monosodique, Glutamate
ga: Glútamáit aonsóidiam
gl: Glutamato monosódico
hi: मोनोसोडियम ग्लूटामेट
hr: Mononatrijev glutaminat
hu: Nátrium-glutamát
id: Mononatrium glutamat
it: Glutammato monosodico
ja: グルタミン酸ナトリウム
ko: 글루탐산 나트륨
lt: Mononatrio glutamatas
lv: Mononātrija glutamāts
ml: അജിനോമോട്ടോ
mr: मोनोसोडियम ग्लुटामेट
ms: Monosodium glutamat
my: အချိုမှုန့်
nb: Natriumglutamat
nl: Mononatriumglutamaat
nn: Natriumglutamat
pl: Glutaminian sodu
pt: Glutamato monossódico
ro: Glutamat monosodic
ru: Глутамат натрия
sh: Mononatrijum glutamat
si: මොනොසෝඩියම් ග්ලූටමේට්
sk: Glutaman sodný
sl: Mononatrijevgluamat
sr: Mononatrijum glutamat
su: Monosodium glutamat
sv: Natriumglutamat
ta: மோனோ சோடியம் குளூட்டாமேட்
te: మోనో సోడియం గ్లూటామేట్‌
th: โมโนโซเดียมกลูตาเมต
tl: Betsin
tr: Monosodyum glutamat
ug: تېتىتقۇ
uk: Глутамат натрію
ur: چینی نمک
uz: Monosodium glyutamat
vi: Bột ngọt
yi: מאָנאָנאַטריומגלוטאַמאַט
zh: 味精

en: Cumin, Cummin, Jeera
ar: كمون
bg: Кимион
ca: Comí, Comí castellà
da: Spidskommen
de: Kreuzkümmel
eo: Oficina kuminoj
es: Comino
fi: juustokumina
fr: Cumin, Jeera
ga: Cuimín
hr: Kim
io: Kumino
ja: クミン
ku: Reşke
la: Cuminum cyminum
lt: Kuminas
nb: Spisskummer
nl: Komijn
nn: Spisskummar
ro: Chimionul
sv: Spiskummin
sw: Jira
tr: Kimyon, Boyotu
ur: زیرہ
zh: 孜然

en: Ground cumin seeds
da: Malet spidskommen
es: Comino molido
fr: Cumin moulu
hr: Mljevene sjemenke kimaskumin
lt: Maltos kuminų sėklos
nl: Gemalen komijn, Djinten
sv: Mald spiskummin

en: Cumin powders, Jeera powder
da: Spidskommenpulvere
es: Comino en polvo
fr: Cumin en poudre
sv: Spiskumminpulver

en: Whole cumin seeds, Cumin seeds
da: Hele spidskommenfrø
de: Ganze Kreuzkümmelsamen
es: Comino en grano
fr: Graines de cumin
hr: Cijele sjemenke kumina
lt: Kuminų sėklos
nl: Komijnzaden, Grove komijn
sv: Hela spiskumminfrön

en: Caraway seeds
ca: Llavors d'alcaravia
cs: Kmín
da: Kommenfrø, Kommen
de: Kümmelsamen, Kümmel
es: Semillas de alcaravea
et: Köömned
fi: Kumina
fr: Carvi
hr: Sjemenke kima
id: Jintan
it: Seme di cumino dei prati
ja: キャラウェイシード
la: Carvi fructus
lt: Kmynų sėklos
lv: Ķimeņu sēklas
nl: Karwijzaad
pl: Kminek
ro: Semințe de chimen
ru: Семена тмина
sl: Seme navadne kumine
sv: Kumminfrön, Kummin
yi: קימל זוימען
zh: 葛缕子, 葛缕子籽, 葛縷子, 葛縷子籽

en: Whole caraway seeds
da: Hele kommenfrø
de: Ganze Kümmelsamen
es: Semillas de alcaravea en grano
fr: Graines de carvi
hr: Cijele sjemenke kima
nl: Grove karwijzaden
sv: Hela kumminfrön

en: Ground caraway seeds, Ground dried caraway seeds
da: Malede kommenfrø, Malet kommen
es: Semillas de alcaravea molido
fr: Graines de carvi moulu
hr: Mljevene sjemenke kima
lt: Maltos kmynų sėklos
nl: Gemalen karwijzaad
sv: Malna kumminfrön, Malen kummin, Kummin malen

en: Caraway seed powders, Caraway powders
da: Kommenfrøpulvere, Kommenpulvere
es: Semillas de alcaravea en polvo
fr: Carvi en poudre
sv: Kumminfrönpulver, Kumminpulver

en: Fenugreek products, Fenugreek
de: Bockshornkleeprodukte
es: Productos del fenogreco, Fenogreco, Alholva
fr: Produits de le fenugrec, Fenugrec
hr: Proizvodi od piskavice
ja: フェヌグリーク
la: Trigonella foenum-graecum
lt: Vaistinės ožragės produktai, ožragė
nl: Fenegriek
pl: Kozieradka

en: Fenugreek leaves
de: Bockshornkleeblätter
es: Hojas de fenogreco
fr: Feuilles de fenugrec
hr: Listovi piskavice
nl: Fenegriekbladeren
pl: Liście kozieradki

en: Fresh fenugreek leaves
es: Hojas de fenogreco frescas
hr: Svježeg lišća piskavice
nl: Verse fenegriek